Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2712
Public hearing; governing body; adopt resolution; filing.

Upon completion of the proposed plan, the governing body of the city shall schedule a public hearing at which such plan shall be presented for public comment and discussion. Following the public hearing, the governing body shall adopt the proposed plan and any amendments by resolution. At the discretion of the governing body, the resolution may include the full text of the proposed plan or it may be incorporated by reference. The resolution shall include a statement of the date at which the economic development program will be presented to the voters of the city for approval pursuant to section 18-2713 and the language of the ballot question as it will appear on the ballot. Following its adoption, a copy of the resolution and the proposed plan shall be filed with the city clerk who shall make it available for public review at city hall during regular business hours.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 21.